Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.490

Election of delegates—Ascertaining result.

The election officials shall count and determine the number of votes cast for each individual; and shall also count and determine the aggregate number of votes cast for all candidates whose names appear under each of the respective headings. Where more than the required number have been voted for, the ballot must be rejected. The vote must be canvassed in each county by the county canvassing board, and certificate of results must be transmitted to the secretary of state. Upon receiving the certificate, the secretary of state may require precinct returns from any county to be forwarded for the secretary's examination.

Where a district embraces precincts of more than one county, the secretary of state shall combine the votes from all the precincts included in each district. The delegates elected in each district will be the number of candidates corresponding to the number of state representatives from the district, who receive the highest number of votes in the group (either "for" or "against") that received an aggregate number of votes for all candidates in the group greater than the aggregate number of votes for all the candidates in the other group. The secretary of state shall issue certificates of election to the delegates so elected.

[ 2013 c 11 s 58; 2011 c 10 s 46; 2003 c 111 s 1438; 1965 c 9 s 29.74.100. Prior: 1933 c 181 s 6; RRS s 5249-6. Formerly RCW 29.74.100.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.